dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX J   eň          ní         deň is:locative is:plural
SFX J   eň          ňoch       [dž]eň is:locative is:plural
SFX J   ň           ňoch       [^dž]eň is:locative is:plural
SFX J   er          roch       er is:locative is:plural
SFX J   or          roch       or is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [^o]r is:locative is:plural
SFX J   ôš          ošoch      ôš is:locative is:plural
SFX J   eť          ťoch       eť is:locative is:plural
SFX J   ôž          ožoch      ôž is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [e][^cľňr] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [^ceľňršž] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   iec         cami       iec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ec          cami       [^i]ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^e]c is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   el          lami       el is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ol          lami       ol is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [^eo]l is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   eľ          ľami       [gz]eľ is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   eň          ňami       [dž]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^dž]eň is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   er          rami       er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   or          rami       or is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]r is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ôš          ošmi       ôš is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   eť          ťami       eť is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ôž          ožmi       ôž is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [e][^cľňr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^ceľňršž] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           a          [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:genitive
SFX J   0           ovi        ĺž is:dative
SFX J   0           ovi        ĺž is:locative
SFX J   0           u          [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:dative
SFX J   0           i          [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:locative
SFX J   0           om         [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:instrumental
SFX J   0           e          [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   0           ov         [aáeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:genitive is:plural
SFX J   0           om         [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:dative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [aádeéiílĺnoruúyý][šž] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [lnr]š is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           a          [áoôúýy][ľň] is:genitive
SFX J   0           a          [áoôúýy][ľň] is:accusative
SFX J   0           u          iaľ is:dative
SFX J   0           u          [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:dative
SFX J   ľ           li         [áaoôŕúýy]ľ is:locative
SFX J   ň           ni         [áaoôŕúýy]ň is:locative
SFX J   0           om         [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:instrumental
SFX J   ľ           le         [áaoôŕúýy]ľ is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   ň           ne         [áaoôŕúýy]ň is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   0           ov         [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:genitive is:plural
SFX J   0           om         [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:dative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [áaoôŕúýy][ľň] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX L Y 77
SFX L   ec          ca         ec is:genitive
SFX L   o           a          o is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [tv]er is:genitive
SFX L   er          ra         [^tv]er is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [^e][cr] is:genitive
SFX L   es          sa         es is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [^céior] is:genitive
SFX L   us          a          us is:genitive
SFX L   ec          covi       ec is:dative
SFX L   0           vi         o is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [tv]er is:dative
SFX L   er          rovi       [^tv]er is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [^e][cr] is:dative
SFX L   es          sovi       es is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [^céior] is:dative
SFX L   us          ovi        us is:dative
SFX L   o           a          o is:accusative
SFX L   ec          com        ec is:instrumental
SFX L   0           m          o is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er is:instrumental
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr] is:instrumental
SFX L   es          som        es is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [^céior] is:instrumental
SFX L   us          om         us is:instrumental
SFX L   0           e          č is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   ec          ce         ec is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           via        o is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          ár is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^áe][cr] is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   es          sy         es is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^čcéior] is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   us          y          us is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cov        ec is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           v          o is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [tv]er is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   er          rov        [^tv]er is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [^e][cr] is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   es          sov        es is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [^céior] is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   us          ov         us is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   ec          com        ec is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           m          o is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er is:dative is:plural
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr] is:dative is:plural
SFX L   es          som        es is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [^céior] is:dative is:plural
SFX L   us          om         us is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          č is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          ce         ec is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cov        ec is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           v          o is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          ár is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   es          sov        es is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^čcéior] is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   us          ov         us is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          coch       ec is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           ch         o is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [tv]er is:locative is:plural
SFX L   er          roch       [^tv]er is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [^e][cr] is:locative is:plural
SFX L   es          soch       es is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [^céior] is:locative is:plural
SFX L   us          och        us is:locative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cami       ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   o           ami        o is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [tv]er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   er          rami       [^tv]er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [^e][cr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   es          sami       es is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [^céior] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   us          ami        us is:instrumental is:plural
