dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
ampérmeter/J po:noun is:masculine
bagateľ/J po:noun is:masculine
beláň/L po:noun is:masculine
bicykel/J po:noun is:masculine
bobor/L po:noun is:masculine
bodec/J po:noun is:masculine
brav/L po:noun is:masculine
bridž/J po:noun is:masculine
buldog/L po:noun is:masculine
bunker/J po:noun is:masculine
bylinožravec/L po:noun is:masculine
cicavec/L po:noun is:masculine
cumeľ/J po:noun is:masculine
červiačik/L po:noun is:masculine
čistec/J po:noun is:masculine
čížik/L po:noun is:masculine
čučko/L po:noun is:masculine
danielik/L po:noun is:masculine
dažďovník/L po:noun is:masculine
deliteľ/J po:noun is:masculine
desatorák/L po:noun is:masculine
dĺžeň/J po:noun is:masculine
drozd/L po:noun is:masculine
elektrospotrebič/J po:noun is:masculine
flyš/J po:noun is:masculine
fukso/L po:noun is:masculine
golier/J po:noun is:masculine
grizly/L po:noun is:masculine
hádik/L po:noun is:masculine
Hanoj/J po:noun is:masculine
havo/L po:noun is:masculine
hermafrodit/L po:noun is:masculine
hlaváč/L po:noun is:masculine
hlavonožec/CL po:noun is:masculine
hmyzožravec/CL po:noun is:masculine
hokej/J po:noun is:masculine
husacinec/J po:noun is:masculine
chrobáčik/L po:noun is:masculine
imidž/J po:noun is:masculine
jaguár/L po:noun is:masculine
jazvec/CL po:noun is:masculine
ježko/L po:noun is:masculine
júl/L po:noun is:masculine
kábel/J po:noun is:masculine
kartáč/J po:noun is:masculine
kladkostroj/J po:noun is:masculine
kliešť/L po:noun is:masculine
kocúrik/L po:noun is:masculine
kokeršpaniel/L po:noun is:masculine
komentár/J po:noun is:masculine
kotol/J po:noun is:masculine
kozol/L po:noun is:masculine
kôň/CL po:noun is:masculine
krab/L po:noun is:masculine
kredenc/J po:noun is:masculine
krtko/L po:noun is:masculine
krveľ/J po:noun is:masculine
kýbeľ/J po:noun is:masculine
lemeš/J po:noun is:masculine
levíček/L po:noun is:masculine
livrej/J po:noun is:masculine
los/L po:noun is:masculine
ľudoop/L po:noun is:masculine
maco/L po:noun is:masculine
mandeľ/J po:noun is:masculine
meč/J po:noun is:masculine
medveď/L po:noun is:masculine
mikrofiš/J po:noun is:masculine
mliečňak/L po:noun is:masculine
moľ/J po:noun is:masculine
mravec/CL po:noun is:masculine
napájač/J po:noun is:masculine
nitovač/J po:noun is:masculine
obrazec/J po:noun is:masculine
odmasťovač/J po:noun is:masculine
odštiepenec/J po:noun is:masculine
okysličovač/J po:noun is:masculine
osmonoh/L po:noun is:masculine
osteň/J po:noun is:masculine
pajác/J po:noun is:masculine
paroháčik/L po:noun is:masculine
patricij/J po:noun is:masculine
pes/L po:noun is:masculine
pilotáž/J po:noun is:masculine
plevinec/J po:noun is:masculine
podstavec/J po:noun is:masculine
pointer/L po:noun is:masculine
polovodič/J po:noun is:masculine
prameň/J po:noun is:masculine
prepisovač/J po:noun is:masculine
prsteň/J po:noun is:masculine
pútač/J po:noun is:masculine
rak/L po:noun is:masculine
regál/J po:noun is:masculine
retriever/L po:noun is:masculine
roj/J po:noun is:masculine
rozrývač/J po:noun is:masculine
rus/L po:noun is:masculine
rýchlovarič/J po:noun is:masculine
rys/L po:noun is:masculine
samec/CL po:noun is:masculine
sendvičovač/J po:noun is:masculine
slávik/L po:noun is:masculine
sledovač/J po:noun is:masculine
slimáčik/L po:noun is:masculine
smrtihlav/L po:noun is:masculine
snowboarding/L po:noun is:masculine
spínač/J po:noun is:masculine
srnec/CL po:noun is:masculine
stavovec/J po:noun is:masculine
stupeň/J po:noun is:masculine
sumec/CL po:noun is:masculine
šalabachter/J po:noun is:masculine
šimpanz/L po:noun is:masculine
škopec/J po:noun is:masculine
štajerák/L po:noun is:masculine
štebeľ/J po:noun is:masculine
šťúrik/L po:noun is:masculine
švindeľ/J po:noun is:masculine
tátoš/L po:noun is:masculine
termit/L po:noun is:masculine
tchor/L po:noun is:masculine
tisíc/J po:noun is:masculine
trilobit/L po:noun is:masculine
trolej/J po:noun is:masculine
úľ/J po:noun is:masculine
ulitník/L po:noun is:masculine
vecheť/J po:noun is:masculine
vlk/L po:noun is:masculine
vokáň/J po:noun is:masculine
voš/L po:noun is:masculine
vták/L po:noun is:masculine
výdoj/J po:noun is:masculine
vzorkovač/J po:noun is:masculine
zajac/L po:noun is:masculine
zajo/L po:noun is:masculine
zavináč/L po:noun is:masculine
zavlažovač/J po:noun is:masculine
zrovnávač/J po:noun is:masculine
zubor/L po:noun is:masculine
žáner/J po:noun is:masculine
žltochvost/L po:noun is:masculine
